Louisiana, session 2026, HB1240.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S.38:330.1(C)(1)(a)(iv) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§330.1. Southeast Louisiana Flood Protection Authority-East and Southeast
Louisiana Flood Protection Authority-West Bank; territorial jurisdiction;
board of commissioners; appointments; terms; compensation; vacancy;
officers; meetings; domicile
* * *
C.(1) There is hereby created a board of commissioners for each flood
protection authority as follows:
(a) The board of commissioners of the Southeast Louisiana Flood Protection
Authority-East shall be composed of nine members, one member from St. Bernard
Parish, two members from Jefferson Parish, three members from Orleans Parish who
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-3561 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1240
shall reside within the territorial jurisdiction of the authority, and three members who
do not reside within the territorial jurisdiction of the authority. The members shall
be appointed by the governor from nominations submitted by the nominating
committee as follows:
* * *
(iv) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
composition and membership of the Southeast Louisiana Flood Protection Authority-
East shall be reconstituted and the members as of December 1, 2026 shall be subject
to reconfirmation by the Senate. The failure of the Senate to reconfirm a member
shall be considered an unexpected vacancy and the nominating committee shall
follow the procedure outlined in Paragraph (3) of this Subsection. The term of any
member not reconfirmed by the Senate shall expire immediately and the person shall
not be reappointed as a member for a period of two years. If the member is
reconfirmed the same term applicable to the original appointment shall apply. Any
successor appointed and confirmed pursuant to this Act shall complete the term
originally applicable to their predecessor.
* * *